Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-502.01
Policy loans; variable interest rates.

The purpose of sections 44-502.01 to 44-502.04 is to permit and set guidelines for life insurers to include in life insurance policies issued after August 30, 1981, a provision for periodic adjustment of policy loan interest rates.

Laws 1981, LB 355, § 14.